Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-712
Tax Commissioner; supervise tax collections.

It is hereby made the duty of the Tax Commissioner to supervise and enforce collections of all taxes that may be due under the provisions of sections 57-701 to 57-714.

Laws 1955, c. 219, § 12, p. 613;

Laws 1967, c. 351, § 8, p. 935.